test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-stuul_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - stuuʹl â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     stuuʹl+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: stuuʹl
     stuuʹl+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: stuuʹl
     stuuʹl+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: stuuʹl
     stuuʹl+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: stooula
     stuuʹl+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: stuuʹlest
     stuuʹl+N+Sg+Com+Indef: stuuʹlin
     stuuʹl+N+Ess+Indef: stuuʹlen
     stuuʹl+N+Par+Indef: stuuʹled
     stuuʹl+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [stuuʹltaa, stuuʹltää]
     stuuʹl+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: stuuʹl
     stuuʹl+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: stuuʹli
     stuuʹl+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: stuuʹlid
     stuuʹl+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: stuuʹlid
     stuuʹl+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: stuuʹlin
     stuuʹl+N+Pl+Com+Indef: stuuʹlivuiʹm
     stuuʹl+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [stuuʹlitaa, stuuʹlitää]
     
